Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.610

Prescription drug return and reuse—Rules.

The commission must adopt rules allowing the department of corrections pharmacy to accept returns of unit dose packages or full or partial multiple dose medication cards from the facilities it serves and reuse the unexpired medication.

[ 2020 c 264 s 1.]